Utah statutes.
11-13-309.   Venue for civil action -- No trial de novo.

(1)  Any civil action seeking to challenge, enforce, or otherwise have reviewed, any order of the board, or any alleviation contract, shall be brought only in the district court for the county within which is located the candidate to which the order or contract pertains.  If the candidate is the state of Utah, the action shall be brought in the district court for Salt Lake County.  Any action brought in any judicial district shall be ordered transferred to the court where venue is proper under this section.

(2)  In any civil action seeking to challenge, enforce, or otherwise review, any order of the board, a trial de novo may not be held.  The matter shall be considered on the record compiled before the board, and the findings of fact made by the board may not be set aside by the district court unless the board clearly abused its discretion.

